Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-502. Termination of active membership — Definitions.

A member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall terminate covered employment and remain terminated during the member's applicable termination separation period to become and remain eligible for retirement.

Effective July 1, 2011, a member shall not be terminated from employment for purposes of retirement eligibility if within six (6) calendar months of the member's effective date of retirement the member:

Meets both of the following requirements:

Becomes employed with an employer covered by the system; and

Has not attained the system's normal retirement age; or

Does not have a total or a combined total of thirty-eight (38) years or more of credited service in the system, Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, or reciprocal service in another eligible state retirement system.

If a member has a combined total of thirty-eight (38) years or more of credited service in the system, Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, or reciprocal credited service in another eligible state retirement system, then the member shall not be terminated from employment for purposes of retirement eligibility if within one (1) calendar month of the member's effective date of retirement the member:

Becomes employed with an employer covered by the system; and

Has not attained the system's normal retirement age.

A member who fails to meet both the termination requirement and the termination separation period requirement of this subsection shall:

Repay retirement benefits paid during the period the member did not meet the requirements; and

Forfeit all future retirement benefits until the member files a new completed retirement application using the standard system process.

The system may require the repayment of retirement benefits, interest, and distributions from the member directly or indirectly by using the system's standard withholding rule.

If a member fails to meet the termination requirement or to complete the termination separation period, then the member is not eligible to receive retirement benefits until the member files a new completed retirement application using the standard system process. The member shall be subject to a new termination separation period.

During the termination separation period, the member shall remain terminated and shall not:

Form an employment relationship with any system-covered employer;

Render any compensable services to or on behalf of any system-covered employer, except that a member may provide volunteer activities at a system-covered employer that does not have the effect of holding a position open for the member during a termination separation period; and

Exercise any authority to act as a representative of any system-covered employer or exercise any authority over employees of any system-covered employer.

When a member is no longer employed by an employer in a position covered by the system, the person shall cease to be an active member of the system.

If an inactive member has not retired and later becomes reemployed by an employer in a position covered by the system, the member shall become an active member and be eligible to accrue additional service credit.

If the member's service credit during reemployment is less than one-fourth (¼) of a fiscal year under § 24-7-601, he or she shall be considered to be an inactive member at the termination of the reemployed service, and the only monthly benefits payable shall be those provided by § 24-7-707.

Before July 1, 2011, an active member shall receive credit for any previous unreported service after July 1, 1937, by paying the system the employee and employer contributions in effect during the previous service, together with interest from the dates of the service to the date of payment in full.

On or after July 1, 2011, previous unreported service rendered after July 1, 1937, may be established by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

For previous service rendered before July 1, 1971, service credit shall be permitted for service in a fiscal year only if the minimum days of service rendered is sufficient for one (1) year of service credit under § 24-7-601 in a fiscal year.

Upon a member's retirement, the person shall cease to be an active member and, except as otherwise provided in this act, he or she shall not accrue additional service credit or make contributions to the system.

As used in this section:

“System-covered employer” means all employers as defined in § 24-7-202 and also includes all employers offering the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as an optional retirement plan on or before January 1, 2011, to any employee;

“Terminate” means:

The member's employment has ended at all system-covered employers;

A complete severance of the employer-employee relationship has occurred at all system-covered employers;

The member has ceased performing any employment services for any system-covered employer, except for uncompensated functions related to the transfer of the duties or the transfer of the position of the member;

The member has not formed any express or implied employment agreement or taken action that would obligate the member to render compensable services to a system-covered employer or entitle a system-covered employer to the services of the member after the termination separation period;

The member has followed normal retirement procedures for resigning from the system-covered employer unless involuntarily terminated before the member's effective date of retirement; and

All system-covered employers have paid or have initiated the process to pay all accumulated benefits such as annual leave and sick leave to the member by the effective date of retirement.

“Terminate” does not mean:

Taking a leave of absence; or

Performing any job duties or services without remuneration, except for the functions related to the transfer of duties or the transfer of the position itself.

Providing volunteer activities at a system-covered employer that does not have the effect of holding a position open for the member during a termination separation period does not mean that the member is not terminated; and

“Termination separation period” means the time from a member's effective date of retirement until the date that the member is no longer prohibited by state law from returning to work at a system-covered employer.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 6; 1975, No. 549, § 3; 1977, No. 541, § 2; 1981, No. 365, § 3; 1983, No. 619, § 6; 1983, No. 665, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1440.3; Acts 1989, No. 652, § 5; 1993, No. 435, § 6; 1995, No. 542, § 4; 2001, No. 1146, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 7; 2009, No. 743, § 1; 2011, No. 45, § 3; 2011, No. 69, § 12; 2011, No. 565, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 974, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, subdivision (b)(4) is set out above as amended by Acts 2011, No. 974.
As amended by Acts 2011, No. 69, subdivision (b)(4) read as follows:

“(A)

Before July 1, 2011, an active member shall receive credit for any previous unreported service after July 1, 1937, by paying the system the employee and employer contributions in effect during the previous service, together with interest from the dates of the service to the date of payment in full.

“(B)

On or after July 1, 2011, previous unreported service rendered after July 1, 1937, may be established by paying the actuarial equivalent of the member's benefits to the system.

“(C)

For previous service rendered before July 1, 1971, service credit shall be permitted for service in a fiscal school year only if at least one hundred sixty (160) days of service were rendered in the fiscal school year.”

This section is being set out to update a reference.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), rewrote (a)(2), inserted (a)(4) and (a)(5), and made minor stylistic changes in (a)(1) and (a)(3).

The 2011 amendment by No. 45, in (a)(2)(A), substituted “July 1, 2011” for “July 2, 2009” and “six (6) calendar months”
for “one hundred eighty (180) days”; substituted “one (1) calendar month” for “thirty (30) days” in (a)(2)(B); and substituted “six (6) calendar months” for “one hundred eighty (180) days” in (a)(4)(A).

The 2011 amendment by No. 565, substituted “and remain terminated during the member's applicable termination separation period to become and remain” for “to be” in (a)(1); in the introductory language of (a)(2)(A), substituted “July 1, 2011” for “July 2, 2009” and substituted “six (6) calendar months” for “one hundred eighty (180) days”; substituted “one (1) calendar month” for “thirty (30) days” in the introductory language of (a)(2)(B); subdivided part of former (a)(3) as (a)(3)(B); added (a)(3)(A);
in (a)(3), inserted “both” and “and the termination separation period requirement”;
rewrote (a)(3)(B); deleted (a)(4)(A) and redesignated (a)(4)(B) as (a)(4); in (a)(4), inserted “interest, and distributions” and substituted “directly or indirectly by using” for “indirectly under”; rewrote (a)(5); added (a)(6); and added (d).

The 2011 amendment by No. 974 substituted “member” for “person” in (b)(2); in (b)(3), inserted “credit” and substituted “one-fourth (¼) of a fiscal year under § 24-7-601” for “thirty (30) days”; in (b)(4)(A)(i), inserted “Before July 1, 2011” at the beginning, and substituted “by paying” for “upon paying” and “employee and employer contributions” for “member contributions”; inserted (b)(4)(A)(ii); in (b)(4)(B), substituted “fiscal year” for “fiscal school year” twice and substituted “the minimum days of service rendered is sufficient for one (1) year of service credit under § 24-7-601” for “at least one hundred twenty (120) days of service were rendered.”

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1973, No. 427, codified as §§ 24-7-201 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, 24-7-716.

24-7-503. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the effect of employment by a private school, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 4, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1959, No. 55, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-1455, 80-1456.

24-7-504. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning authority, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 146, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 865, § 4.

24-7-505. Buyout plan for inactive members — Definition.

As used in this section, “buyout plan” means a voluntary program established by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to make a one-time lump-sum payment to a member, surviving spouse, or alternate payee in exchange for a member's, surviving spouse's, or alternate payee's cancellation of membership and retirement benefit rights in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

A buyout plan established by the board:

May be offered periodically and have a limited term of duration for participation, as determined by a resolution adopted by the board at a meeting of the board;

Shall specifically identify the formulas by which contributory and noncontributory service or a future retirement benefit will be purchased by the system as a one-time lump-sum payment from the system, paid directly to the member, surviving spouse, or alternate payee or transferred to another administrator in compliance with the Internal Revenue Code; and

Applies only to a group of members, group of surviving spouses, or group of alternate payees, who:

Are identified by the board as a group eligible to participate in a buyout plan offered by the board; and

Elect to participate in a buyout plan in exchange for future benefit rights in the system.

A buyout plan established by the board may be extended, modified, or expanded by board resolution.

A member is eligible to participate in a buyout plan if the member is:

Eligible for deferred retirement under § 24-7-707; and

Inactive for a minimum of one (1) year following the last fiscal year that the member rendered actual service to a covered employer and received at least one-fourth (¼) year of service credit.

The board may offer a buyout plan to surviving spouses or alternate payees who:

Are eligible for a future retirement benefit from the system; and

Have not received a retirement benefit from the system.

A member who participates in a buyout plan shall receive a one-time lump-sum payment from the system that cancels interest in any retirement benefit and all future rights in the system effective upon tender of payment by the system.

A buyout plan may be used to cancel both a member's contributory and noncontributory credited service in the system.

A member who receives a buyout of his or her credited service under this section may repurchase his or her previously credited service as contributory service after becoming an active member of the system as if the service had been private school service.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 606, § 1; 2017, No. 647, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (b)(3).

24-7-506. Outsourcing — Election to participate — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Covered employer” means any public school, public educational agency, or other eligible employer participating in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

“Covered employer” does not include a nonmandatory employer or a PSHE employer as defined under § 24-7-1602;

“Embedded employee” means a person who:

Provides an outsourced service on the premises of a covered employer; and

Is employed and paid by an outsource contractor.

“Embedded employee” does not include a person who is employed by:

A covered employer listed under § 24-7-202; or

An employer that offers the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as an optional retirement plan as of the date of outsourcing;

“Outsource” or “outsourcing” means the use of a contractor by a covered employer for the performance of a service common to the normal daily operation on the premises of the covered employer;

“Outsource contractor” means a person who is contractually obligated under an outsourcing agreement to provide a covered employer with a service common to the normal daily operation of the covered employer;

“Participating employer” means a covered employer that outsources and opts for the embedded employees of all of its outsource contractors to become members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“School nursing” means a nursing service that is required to be offered in a public school under § 6-18-706 or the Standards for Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts.

“School nursing” does not include nursing services provided by a:

School-based health clinic under § 6-18-703;

Medical clinic operated on a public school campus by a hospital or physician's office that is under contract with the public school;

Healthcare provider other than a nurse; or

Healthcare service reimbursed or paid for by Medicaid, Medicare, health insurance, or any other third-party payer;

“Service common to the normal daily operation” means and is limited to a service that:

Is provided by an outsource contractor or embedded employee to a covered employer;

Is physically provided or based on the premises of a covered employer;

Is paid for with public funds and not with private grant funds; and

Consists of one (1) or more of the following:

The maintenance and operation of:

One (1) or more vehicles used for the regular and daily transport of passengers; and

A facility that provides support for the maintenance and operation of one (1) or more vehicles described under subdivision (a)(7)(D)(i)(a) of this section;

The maintenance and operation of a cafeteria or other food service operation;

Custodial or maintenance services for the regular and continuous maintenance, repair, and upkeep of grounds or facilities;

Security services that are not covered by another retirement system;

School nursing;

Substitute teaching; or

Service as a teacher's aide; and

“Surcharge employer” means a covered employer that outsources and pays a surcharge to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System in lieu of opting for the embedded employees of outsource contractors to accrue service credit in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

A covered employer that enters into an agreement to outsource a service common to the normal daily operation shall make an irrevocable election to be either a participating employer or a surcharge employer within sixty (60) days of the outsourcing agreement on a form provided by or in a manner established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a covered employer elects to become a surcharge employer under this section, then the covered employer shall account for and remit to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System a monthly surcharge on the total salaries paid to all the embedded employees on an aggregate basis as follows:

Five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) during the 2018 fiscal year;

One percent (1%) during the 2019 fiscal year;

Two percent (2%) during the 2020 fiscal year;

Three percent (3%) during the 2021 fiscal year; and

An amount not to exceed four percent (4%) during the 2022 fiscal year and succeeding fiscal years as established by a resolution of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System at a meeting of the board.

If the covered employer is outsourcing on August 1, 2017, the surcharge shall be payable beginning in the 2018 fiscal year.

A surcharge adopted by the board applies to an entire fiscal year and shall be adopted prior to the beginning of the fiscal year.

If a covered employer elects to become a participating employer as provided under this section, then the covered employer shall account for and remit each of the covered employer's contributions in the same amount and in the same manner as required for covered employer contributions under § 24-7-401 and member contributions under § 24-7-406.

A covered employer that begins outsourcing after August 1, 2017, and elects to become a participating employer may phase-in the election by selecting an effective date that is no later than the beginning of the third fiscal year after the effective date of the outsourcing agreement.

During the phase-in of becoming a participating employer, the covered employer shall account for and remit a phase-in surcharge in the same amount and manner required of a surcharge employer under subsection (c) of this section.

If a covered employer is outsourcing on August 1, 2017, and the covered employer elects to become a participating employer, then the covered employer may phase-in the election by selecting an effective date that is no later than the beginning of the fourth fiscal year after August 1, 2017.

During the phase-in of becoming a participating employer, the covered employer shall account for and remit a phase-in surcharge in the same amount and manner as required of a surcharge employer under subsection (c) of this section.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may require a covered employer that makes an election under this section to provide any documentation necessary to collect and account for the surcharge or contributions as is consistent with the covered employer's election.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may collect an unremitted surcharge amount due, including interest, from a surcharge employer under § 24-7-401 or contribution due from a participating employer under § 24-7-406 in any manner allowed by law.

If a covered employer reasonably accepts a written statement from an outsource contractor reporting the salaries paid by the outsource contractor to embedded employees for services common to the normal daily operation of the covered employer, it shall be conclusively presumed that the written statement accurately reflects the salaries subject to surcharge under this section.

A covered employer or an outsource contractor may request a determination from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as to whether an embedded employee performs or will perform a service common to the normal daily operation of a covered employer.

A request made under subdivision (g)(1) of this section shall include:

Information about the employment relationship and contract provisions that are necessary for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to evaluate the service provided to the covered employer; and

Any additional information requested by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System to make the determination.

The board may promulgate rules necessary to administer this section.

The Division of Youth Services Education System shall be a participating employer and may designate any or all of its embedded employees as eligible for membership in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

An embedded employee of a contractor for the Division of Youth Services Education System who becomes a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall remain a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as long as the member remains an embedded employee of a contractor for the Division of Youth Services Education System.

The use of the terms “employee” and “employer” in this section does not:

Create or modify an employment relationship between an embedded employee and a covered employer;

Create, permit, expand, or modify any liability or obligation by a covered employer to an embedded employee; or

Create, permit, expand, or modify any cause of action by an embedded employee against a covered employer under any employment, labor, civil rights, or other law.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 575, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 575, § 3, provided: “Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017], a covered employer that is outsourcing a service common to normal daily operation shall make an irrevocable election to be either a participating employer or a surcharge employer on a form provided by or in a manner established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.”

Acts 2017, No. 575, § 4, provided: “Except for the Division of Youth Services Education System, each covered employer shall provide the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System with a preliminary report accounting for the total amount of salary paid to embedded employees of outsource contractors no later than sixty (60) days from the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017].”